Utah statutes.
30-3-16.6.   Information not available to public.
Neither the names of petitioners nor respondents, nor the contents of
petitions for conciliation filed under this act, shall be available or open to
public inquiry, except that an attorney for a person seeking to file an action
for divorce, annulment or separate maintenance may determine from the clerk of
the court if the other spouse has filed a petition for conciliation.
